Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2163.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "practice of dentistry" and "restricted faculty license" in section 2 of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.216, No.76), known as The Dental Law, are amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.--A person engages in the "Practice of Dentistry," within the meaning of this act, who diagnoses, treats, operates on, or prescribes for any disease, pain or injury, or regulates any deformity or physical condition, of the human teeth, jaws, or associated structures, or conducts a 12345678910111213141516171819202122 physical evaluation, or administers anesthetic agents, or uses ionizing radiation in the course of dental practice, or who fits, constructs, and inserts any artificial appliance, plate, or denture for the human teeth or jaws, or who holds himself or herself out as being able or legally authorized to do so. The term "Practice of Dentistry" includes the practice of dentistry under a restricted faculty license. The term "Practice of Dentistry" does not include:(a) The practice of any of the healing arts by duly licensed practitioners.(b) The extracting of teeth or relieving pain by a licensed physician or surgeon in emergencies, or the making of applications for such purposes.(c) The practice of dentistry by a duly licensed practitioner of dentistry of any other state or country, for the limited purpose of consultation with respect to any case under treatment in this Commonwealth, or of demonstrating before any duly authorized dental society in this Commonwealth.(e) The practice of dentistry in clinical departments and laboratories of dental schools and their affiliated facilities approved by the board in the Commonwealth, by bona fide students pursuing a course of study leading to the degree of Doctor of Dental Surgery or Doctor of Dental Medicine.(f) The practice of dentistry in a dental clinic operated not for profit for the duration of an internship, residency or other graduate training program approved by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation or a dental anesthesiology training program that meets the standards of an accrediting body acceptable to the board, by persons having acquired the preliminary and professional education required for 20260HB2163PN2800 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 admission into the program, after notification to the board.(g) The practice of dentistry in a clinical continuing education course offered by a dental school in this Commonwealth for a duration of [twenty days or less] one year, either continuous or in several sessions, where dentists licensed in the United States or other countries work under the direct supervision of dentists licensed by the Commonwealth, and delivered within the educational facilities of a dental school in this Commonwealth that is approved by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation.* * *"Restricted Faculty License" means a license granted to an individual for the limited purpose of teaching, including clinical teaching, in [a dental school or] any of the following:(1) A clinical facility owned and operated by a dental school or affiliated academic health care center when the clinical facility or affiliated academic health care center is not operated for the profit of the dental school or any affiliated third party.(2) An advanced dental education program as a faculty member at an accredited dental school in this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. Sections 3(c), (d) and (d.1)(1) introductory paragraph, 10(g.1) and 11.11(a) introductory paragraph and (3) and (b) of the act are amended to read:Section 3. General Powers of the State Board of Dentistry.--The State Board of Dentistry (hereinafter called the board) shall have the following powers and duties:* * *(c) To provide for and to regulate the licensing, and to 20260HB2163PN2800 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license to practice dentistry, after examination, any duly qualified applicant, at least twenty-one years of age, of good moral character, not addicted to the use of intoxicating liquor or narcotic drugs, who has obtained the required education, together with a diploma from an approved institution or college conferring upon him or her the degree of doctor of dental surgery or other established dental degree. In assessing the moral character of an individual with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions). The board shall not issue a license to an applicant who has been convicted of a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act," or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which if committed in this Commonwealth would be a felony under "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act," unless: (1) at least ten (10) years have elapsed from the date of conviction, (2) the applicant satisfactorily demonstrates to the board that he has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction such that licensure of the applicant should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of his patients or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violations, and (3) the applicant otherwise satisfies the qualifications contained in or authorized by this act. As used in this section the term "convicted" shall include a judgment, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere.* * *(d) To provide for and to regulate the licensing, and to license as a dental hygienist, after examination, any duly 20260HB2163PN2800 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualified person, not less than eighteen years of age, of good moral character, not addicted to the use of intoxicating liquor or narcotic drugs, who has obtained the required education for the training of dental hygienists from an approved institution or college that meets or exceeds the minimum standards established by an approved United States Department of Education-recognized regional accrediting agency or the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation. In assessing the moral character of an individual with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113. The board shall, consistent with this act, adopt regulations providing for the general supervision and practice of dental hygienists under this act.(d.1) (1) To provide for and to regulate the certification and to certify as an expanded function dental assistant any duly qualified person[,] who is not less than eighteen years of age, of good moral character[,] and not addicted to the use of intoxicating liquor or narcotic drugs[, who has:]. In assessing the moral character of an individual with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113. To be a duly qualified person for a certification as an expanded function dental assistant, the person must have:* * *Section 10. Penalties.--* * *(g.1) It is unlawful for any restricted faculty licensee to practice dentistry outside the [primary facilities of the dental school] facilities owned or operated by a dental school, an affiliated academic health care center or a dental school-owned 20260HB2163PN2800 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 faculty practice in this Commonwealth at which the individual is licensed to teach.* * *Section 11.11. Restricted Faculty License.--(a) The board shall grant without examination a restricted faculty license to any qualified individual[,] under this subsection who is not less than twenty-five years of age, of good moral character[,] and not addicted to the use of intoxicating liquor or narcotic drugs[, who satisfies the following criteria:]. In assessing the moral character of an individual with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions). To be a qualified individual under this subsection, the individual must satisfy the following criteria:* * *(3) Has successfully completed [a] any of the following:(i) A specialty dentistry program, or advanced dental training in a clinical field, i ncluding advanced education in general dentistry or general practice residency, that is approved by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association.(ii) Training in a dental specialty or in advanced clinical education from an international program.* * *(b) A restricted faculty license shall entitle the licensee to engage as a full-time faculty member in direct clinical teaching and practice, which shall include practicing clinical care for the purpose of instructing and teaching students and residents, [and] supervision of care provided by students and residents and practicing dentistry at an educational clinic for 20260HB2163PN2800 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the purpose of maintaining skills, in no more than one area of specialty or in general dentistry, only within the educational facilities [of] owned or operated by a dental school, an affiliated academic health care center or a dental school-owned faculty practice in this Commonwealth that is approved by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association. [Licensees shall be limited to the primary facilities within the dental school and may not engage in clinical teaching at satellite or other off-campus sites, such as clinics. The practice of dentistry at any satellite or off-campus site requires an unrestricted license to practice dentistry issued by the board.]* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2163PN2800 - 7 - 1234567891011121314